Hawaii statutes.
§346-36 Assistance payments, subject to
change or repeal. All public assistance granted under this chapter shall
be deemed to be granted and held subject to any amending or repealing act that
may be passed and no recipient under this chapter shall have any claim for
compensation or otherwise by reason of the recipient's assistance being
affected in any way by any such amending or repealing act. [L 1941, c 296, pt
of §1; RL 1945, §4841; RL 1955, §108-22; HRS §346-36; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next